Mississippi, session 2026, HB47.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. There is established, at Alcorn State University, Jackson State University and Mississippi Valley State University, the "Robert G. Clark, Jr., Educational Scholarship Program" for the purpose of identifying and providing qualified students with scholarships to assist such students in pursuing degrees through matriculation in education and licensure through the State Department of Education.  The scholarship program shall: (a)  Be developed and implemented in order to provide encouragement, opportunities and incentives for persons pursuing an education degree at Alcorn State University, Jackson State University or Mississippi Valley State University to: (i)  Provide services as a licensed full-time teacher in a public school district in Mississippi; and (ii)  Receive specialized training to meet the needs of public school districts designated as a geographical critical teacher shortage area by the State Board of Education; (b)  Be administered by the Deans of the Alcorn State University, Jackson State University and Mississippi Valley State University Colleges of Education, respective to his or her individual institution of employment administration; and (c)  Annually award scholarships to an average of two (2) scholars per institution of higher learning designated in this act, whose scholarship assistance may be funded annually for a period not to exceed four (4) years. SECTION 2.  As used in this act, the following terms shall have the meanings ascribed in this section unless context of use clearly requires otherwise: (a) "Student" means a student enrolled in the Alcorn State University, Jackson State University or Mississippi Valley State University Colleges of Education. (b)  "Dean" means the Dean of the Alcorn State University, Jackson State University and Mississippi Valley State University Colleges of Education, respectively. (c) "Program" means the Robert G. Clark, Jr., Educational Scholarship Program administered by the Alcorn State University, Jackson State University and Mississippi Valley State University Colleges of Education. SECTION 3. The Deans of the Alcorn State University, Jackson State University and Mississippi Valley State University Colleges of Education shall have the following powers and duties: (a)  Develop the administrative policy for the Robert G. Clark, Jr., Educational Scholarship Program; (b)  Promulgating rules and regulations, with the advice and consent of the respective Presidents of Alcorn State University, Jackson State University, Mississippi Valley State University and the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning, pertaining to the implementation and operation of the Robert G. Clark, Jr., Educational Scholarship Program; (c)  Annually establish a selection committee, composed of faculty of the Alcorn State University, Jackson State University and Mississippi Valley State University Colleges of Education, respectively, which shall conduct a process, independent from the university's Admissions Committee, to review applications, conduct virtual or in-person interviews and select recipients; (d)  Establish a budget, with the advice and consent of the respective Presidents of Alcorn State University, Jackson State University, Mississippi Valley State University and the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning, to support the activities of the program and periodically review, and if appropriate, revise the scholarship and other stipends offered through the program; (e)  Review scholarship recipients' progress in the program and mentor students and teachers participating in the program; and (f)  Develop and participate in programs that provide initial practice support in collaboration with other interested professional organizations; (h)  Give preference for approving communities for purposes of Section 4(2)(d) to communities located in areas designated as a geographical critical teacher shortage area by the State Board of Education. SECTION 4. (1)  (a)  Subject to the availability of funds, the program may annually enter into agreements with up to an average of two (2) education students as determined by the criteria established for the administration of the Robert G. Clark, Jr., Educational Scholarship Program. (b)  Each student entering into a program agreement under this section shall receive annual assistance in an amount not to exceed the in-state tuition rate assessed for attending Alcorn State University, Jackson State University or Mississippi Valley State University for a period not to exceed four (4) years for tuition and fees incurred by the student in pursuit of his or her education degree. Upon completion of all commitments under the provisions of the agreement and the provisions of this section, the financial obligations pursuant to this section shall be deemed satisfied and forgiven. (2)  To be eligible for program scholarship funds, recipients shall: (a)  Be a student of the Alcorn State University, Jackson State University and Mississippi Valley State University Colleges of Education; (b)  Agree to become a licensed public school teacher  in a public school district designated as a geographical critical teacher shortage area by the State Board of Education in the State of Mississippi upon graduation; (c)  Enter into a contract with the program to provide services as a full-time public school teacher in a district designated as a geographical critical teacher shortage area by the State Board of Education for a minimum of four (4) years; and (d)  Commence employment as a full-time public school teacher in a district designated as a geographical critical teacher shortage area by the State Board of Education within ninety (90) days after completion of the degree program or, if the scholarship recipient enters a post-degree training program, such as graduate school, internship or residency program, within ninety (90) days after completion of the post-degree training program. (3)  Priority shall be given to Mississippi residents.  If the number of Mississippi residents applying for scholarship funds is less than the number of slots available, nonresident students may be considered.  Nonresident students shall only receive scholarship funds sufficient to pay for in-state tuition rates, and they must meet the same obligations as specified in subsection (2) of this section for students who are residents of the State of Mississippi. (4)  (a)  Recipients of the scholarship must remain in good academic standing while in receipt of this scholarship, as specified in the rules and regulations promulgated by the respective Deans of the Alcorn State University, Jackson State University and Mississippi Valley State University Colleges of Education with the advice and consent of the respective Presidents of Alcorn State University, Jackson State University, Mississippi Valley State University and the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning. (b)  If a student is dismissed or withdraws from the Alcorn State University, Jackson State University or Mississippi Valley State University Colleges of Education, the dean of the respective institution of higher learning shall assess the circumstances of the student's dismissal or withdrawal and make a formal recommendation regarding whether the student shall be liable for the repayment of all or a portion of the financial assistance provided to the student through the program, along with other penalties that may be prescribed in accordance with the policies adopted by the dean as prescribed in Section 6 of this act. (5)  Each dean may adopt additional provisions, requirements or conditions for participating in the program as are practicable and appropriate to accomplish the provisions of the program or which may be required for the implementation or administration of the program, and which are not inconsistent with the provisions of this section. SECTION 5. (1)  The Alcorn State University, Jackson State University and Mississippi Valley State University Colleges of Education, respectively, are authorized to accept gifts, donations, bequests, trusts, grants, endowments, transfers of money or securities, repayments and any other monies from any source whatsoever to be used for the purposes of administering the Robert G. Clark, Jr., Educational Scholarship Program. (2)  Each dean shall prepare and submit an annual report to the Legislature not later than December 1 of each year, which shall include, but not be limited to, information about who received scholarships under the program and how much each person received, and the amount of any funds received under subsection (1) of this section and how those funds were used for the purpose of the program. (3)  The appropriation requests of Alcorn State University, Jackson State University, Mississippi Valley State University Colleges of Education and the program shall be reduced if a saturation point is achieved and the shortage of licensed public school teachers in school districts that are designated as geographical critical teacher shortage areas is adequately addressed. SECTION 6. (1)  A teacher shall be released from the program contract without penalty if: (a)  The teacher has completed the service requirements of the contract; (b)  The teacher is unable to complete the service requirements of the contract because of a permanent physical disability; (c)  The teacher demonstrates extreme hardship or shows other good cause justifying the release; or (d)  The teacher dies. (2)  An obligation to engage in the teaching profession as a public school teacher in accordance with the provisions of Section 4 shall be postponed during: (a)  Any period of temporary medical disability during which the person obligated is unable to teach due to the disability; and (b)  Any other period of postponement agreed to or determined in accordance with criteria agreed to in the practice agreement. (3)  A teacher shall be released from further performance of services under the program contract if he or she is unable to perform his or her contractual obligations to teach due to the suspension or revocation of his or her license by the State Board of Education pursuant Section 37-3-2.  If a teacher is released from his or her contract pursuant to this subsection, the program may recover a portion of or all of the payments made to such teacher under Section 4 of this act.  Each dean may use appropriate remedies available to enforce this subsection. (4)  Upon the failure of a person to satisfy the obligation to engage in the teaching profession as a public school teacher in a school district designated as geographical critical teacher shortage area in accordance with the provisions of this section with no just cause as outlined in subsection (1), that person shall, within ninety (90) days of the failure, be liable for the repayment of all financial assistance provided to such person through the program prescribed in accordance with the policies adopted by the dean of the institution of higher learning for which the scholarship was granted, less a prorated amount based on any periods of teaching meeting the requirements of this section, plus interest at the prime rate of two percent (2%) from the date the assistance accrued.  The interest on any unpaid obligation for violations specified in this subsection shall be compounded annually. SECTION 7.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.